src/pronoun-sje-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON Pronoun 

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Relative ;
Reflexive ;


! Personal pronouns
! =================

LEXICON Personal
mån:m  pers ;
dån:d  pers ;
sån:s  pers ;

LEXICON pers
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom:ån      K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom:ånnå    K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc:uv      K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen:uv      K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill:unje    K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill:unji    K ; ! http://www.lokalhistoriewiki.no/index.php/Pitesamisk_grammatikk
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine:uvne    K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela:uvvste  K ; 
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela:uvsste  K ; ! http://www.lokalhistoriewiki.no/index.php/Pitesamisk_grammatikk
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Com:ujna    K ;

+Pron+Pers+Du+Nom:åj      K ;
+Pron+Pers+Du+Nom:åjå     K ;
+Pron+Pers+Du+Nom:ååj     K ; ! http://www.lokalhistoriewiki.no/index.php/Pitesamisk_grammatikk
+Pron+Pers+Du+Acc:unuov   K ;
+Pron+Pers+Du+Gen:unuo    K ;
+Pron+Pers+Du+Ill:unnuj   K ;
+Pron+Pers+Du+Ine:unuon   K ;
+Pron+Pers+Du+Ela:unuost  K ;
+Pron+Pers+Du+Com:unujn   K ;

+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom:ij      K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom:ija     K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc:ijáv    K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen:ijá     K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill:ijjaj   K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine:iján    K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela:ijást   K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Com:ijájn   K ;

+Pron+Pers+Ess+Sg:ånnan # ; ! http://www.lokalhistoriewiki.no/index.php/Pitesamisk_grammatikk
+Pron+Pers+Ess+Du:unnuon # ; ! http://www.lokalhistoriewiki.no/index.php/Pitesamisk_grammatikk


LEXICON Demonstrative
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Nom:dat # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Nom:daht # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Acc:dav # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Gen:dan # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Ill:dasa # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Ine:danne # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Ela:das'te # ; 
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Ela:daste # ; ! kanskje??
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Com:dajna # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Sg+Ess:dánnien # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Nom:dah # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Nom:daha # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Acc:dajt # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Gen:daj # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Ill:dajta # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Ine:daj'tne # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Ine:dajtne # ; !kanskje?
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Ela:daj'ste # ;
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Ela:dajste # ; !kanskje?
dat+Pron+Det+Pl+Com:daj # ;


LEXICON Relative
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Nom:gie # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Acc:giev # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Gen:gien # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Ill:giesa # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Ine:gien'ne # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Ela:gies'te # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Com:giejna # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Sg+Ess:gien'nien # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Nom:gieh # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Acc:giejt # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Gen:giej # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Ill:giejta # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Ine:giejtne # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Ela:giej'ste # ;
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Ela:giejste # ; ! kanskje
gie+Pron+Det+Pl+Com:giej # ;

mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Nom:mij # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Acc:mav # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Acc:máv # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Gen:man # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Ill:masa # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Ine:manne # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Ela:mas'te # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Com:majna # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Sg+Ess:manien # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Nom:mah # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Acc:majt # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Gen:maj # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Ill:majta # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Ine:majtne # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Ine:maj'tne # ; !kanskje
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Ela:maj'ste # ;
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Ela:majste # ; ! kanskje
mij+Pron+Det+Pl+Com:maj # ;



LEXICON Reflexive
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:iehtja # ;

iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:iehtjav # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:iehtjan # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:iehtjasan # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxSg1:ietjanan # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:ietjastan # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxSg1:ietjajnan # ;

iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:ietjavt # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:ietjat # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:iehtjasat # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxSg2:iejanat # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxSg2:ietjastat # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxSg2:ietjajnat # ;

iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:ietjavs # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:ietjas # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:iehtjasis # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxSg3:ietjanis # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxSg3:ietjastis # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxSg3:ietjajnis # ;


iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxDu1:iehtjamenien # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxDu1:iehtjanen # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxDu1:iehtjasenien # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxDu1:ietjamenien # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxDu1:ietjastenien # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxDu1:ietjajnenien # ;

iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxDu2:ietjavten # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxDu2:ietjaten # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxDu2:iehtjasetien # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxDu2:ietjanetien # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxDu2:ietjastetien # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxDu2:ietjajnetien # ;

iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxDu3:ietjavska # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxDu3:ietjaska # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxDu3:iehtjaseská # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxDu3:ietjaneská # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxDu3:ietjasteská # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxDu3:ietjajneská # ;




iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:iehtjameh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:iehtjaneh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:iehtjasenieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxPl1:ietjamenieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxPl1:ietjastenieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxPl1:ietjajnenieh # ;

iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:ietjavteh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:ietjateh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:iehtjasetieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxPl2:ietjanetieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxPl2:ietjastetieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxPl2:ietjajnetieh # ;

iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxPl3:ietjavseh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:ietjaseh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:iehtjasesieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxPl3:ietjanesieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:ietjastesieh # ;
iehtja+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxPl3:ietjajnesieh # ;
